Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.720

Vested membership.

A member who separates or has separated after having completed at least five years of service may remain a member during the period of such member's absence from service for the exclusive purpose only of receiving a retirement allowance under the provisions of RCW 41.40.630 if such member maintains the member's accumulated contributions intact.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 295 s 13.]

NOTES:

Legislative direction and placement—Section headings—1977 ex.s. c 295: See notes following RCW 41.40.610.